Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 121A.241, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin CPR and AED training. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, all high school and middle school athletic coaches and assistant coaches employed by a school district or charter school must obtain and maintain current training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and the use of an automated external defibrillator (AED). After obtaining initial training, coaches and assistant coaches must receive training at least once every two calendar years thereafter on an ongoing basis. Training must be consistent with national, evidence-based, emergency cardiovascular care guidelines. new text end new text begin (b) An individual described in this section who performs CPR or uses an AED in the course of that individual's employment as an athletic coach is not liable in a civil action for damages resulting from an act or omission occurring in that performance, except for an act or omission constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. new text end